Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4 POWERSPORTS VEHICLES
44-20-422. Sales activity following license denial, suspension, or revocation - unlawful act - penalty.

It shall be unlawful and a violation of this part 4 for any person whose wholesaler's, powersports vehicle dealer's, used powersports vehicle dealer's, or powersports vehicle salesperson's license has been denied, suspended, or revoked to exercise the privileges of the license that was denied, suspended, or revoked.

A violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be punishable in accordance with section 44-20-429; except that a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be a class 6 felony.

In any trial for a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section:

A duly authenticated copy of the board's order of denial, suspension, or revocation shall constitute prima facie evidence of the denial, suspension, or revocation;

A duly authenticated invoice, buyer's order, or other customary, written sales or purchase document or instrument proven to be signed by the defendant and indicating the defendant's role in the purchase or sale of a powersports vehicle at a retail or wholesale powersports vehicle sales location shall constitute prima facie evidence of the defendant's exercise of a privilege of licensure;

It shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant bought or sold a powersports vehicle that was, at all relevant times, intended for the defendant's own use and not bought or sold for the purpose of profit or gain; and

The fact that the defendant has a powersports vehicle dealer's, used powersports vehicle dealer's, or powersports vehicle salesperson's license, or another license to buy and sell powersports vehicles, that is issued by a state or jurisdiction other than Colorado, shall not constitute a defense.

Upon the defendant's conviction by entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or judgment or verdict of guilt in connection with a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section or of section 44-20-423 (2) or 42-6-142 (1), the court shall immediately give the executive director written notice of the conviction. In addition, the court shall forward to the executive director copies of documentation of any conviction on a lesser included offense and any amended charge, plea bargain, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, or deferred judgment in connection with the original charge.

Upon receiving notice of a conviction or other disposition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the executive director or his or her designee shall forward the notice to the board, which shall immediately examine its files to determine whether the defendant's license was denied, suspended, or revoked at the time of the offense. If in fact the defendant's license was denied, suspended, or revoked at the time of the offense, the board shall:

Not issue or reinstate any license to the defendant until one year after the time the defendant would otherwise have been eligible to receive a new or reinstated license; and

Revoke or suspend any other licenses held by the defendant until at least one year after the date of the conviction or other disposition.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 119, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-522 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-423. Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful and a violation of this part 4 for any powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative:

To willfully fail to perform or cause to be performed any written warranties made with respect to a powersports vehicle or parts thereof;

To coerce or attempt to coerce any powersports vehicle dealer to perform or allow to be performed an act that could be financially detrimental to the dealer or that would impair the dealer's goodwill or to enter into an agreement with a powersports vehicle manufacturer or distributor that would be financially detrimental to the dealer or impair the dealer's goodwill, by threatening to cancel or not renew a franchise between a powersports vehicle manufacturer or distributor and the dealer;

To coerce or attempt to coerce any powersports vehicle dealer to accept delivery of a powersports vehicle, parts or accessories thereof, or any commodities or services that have not been ordered by the dealer;

To cancel or cause to be canceled, directly or indirectly, without just cause, the franchise of a powersports vehicle dealer, and the nonrenewal of a franchise or selling agreement without just cause is a violation of this subsection (1)(d) and shall constitute an unfair cancellation.

As used in this subsection (1)(d), "just cause" shall be determined in the context of all circumstances surrounding the cancellation or nonrenewal, including but not limited to:

The amount of business transacted by the powersports vehicle dealer;

The investments necessarily made and obligations incurred by the powersports vehicle dealer, including but not limited to goodwill, in the performance of its duties under the franchise agreement, together with the duration and permanency of the investments and obligations;

The potential for harm to consumers as a result of disruption of the business of the powersports vehicle dealer;

The powersports vehicle dealer's failure to provide adequate service of facilities, equipment, parts, and qualified service personnel;

The powersports vehicle dealer's failure to perform warranty work on behalf of the powersports vehicle manufacturer, subject to reimbursement by the powersports vehicle manufacturer; and

The powersports vehicle dealer's failure to substantially comply, in good faith, with requirements of the franchise that are determined to be reasonable and material.

The following conduct by a powersports vehicle dealer shall constitute just cause for termination without consideration of other factors:

Conviction of, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony;

A continuing pattern of fraudulent conduct against the powersports vehicle manufacturer or consumers; or

Continuing failure to operate for ten days or longer.

To withhold, reduce, or delay unreasonably or without just cause delivery of powersports vehicles, powersports vehicle parts and accessories, commodities, or money due powersports vehicle dealers for warranty work done by any powersports vehicle dealer;

To withhold, reduce, or delay unreasonably or without just cause services contracted for by powersports vehicle dealers;

To coerce any powersports vehicle dealer to provide installment financing with a specified financial institution;

To violate any duty imposed by, or fail to comply with, any provision of section 44-20-424, 44-20-425, or 44-20-426;

To fail to provide to the powersports vehicle dealer, within twenty days after receipt of a notice of intent from a powersports vehicle dealer, the list of documents and information necessary to approve the sale or transfer of the ownership of a dealership by sale of the business or by stock transfer or the change in executive management of the dealership;

To fail to confirm within twenty days after receipt of all documents and information listed in subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section that the documentation and information has been received;

To refuse to approve, unreasonably, the sale or transfer of the ownership of a dealership by sale of the business or by stock transfer within sixty days after the manufacturer has received all documents and information necessary to approve the sale or transfer of ownership, or to refuse to approve, unreasonably, the change in executive management of the dealership within sixty days after the manufacturer has received all information necessary to approve the change in management; except that nothing in this part 4 shall authorize the sale, transfer, or assignment of a franchise or a change of the principal operator without the approval of the powersports vehicle manufacturer or distributor unless the manufacturer or distributor fails to send notice of the disapproval within sixty days after receiving all documents and information necessary to approve the sale or transfer of ownership; or

To condition the sale, transfer, relocation, or renewal of a franchise agreement or to condition sales, services, parts, or finance incentives upon site control or an agreement to renovate or make improvements to a facility; except that voluntary acceptance of the conditions by the dealer shall not constitute a violation;

To fail or refuse to offer to its same line-make franchised dealers all models manufactured for that line-make except as a result of a strike or labor difficulty, lack of manufacturing capacity, shortage of materials, freight embargo, or other cause over which the powersports vehicle manufacturer has no control; or

To require a dealer to pay an unreasonable fee, purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other materials, or comply with unreasonable training or facilities requirements as a prerequisite to receiving any particular model of that same line-make, which shall be judged based on the circumstances of the individual dealer and the conditions of the market served by the dealer;

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce any powersports vehicle dealer to refrain from participation in the management of, investment in, or acquisition of another line-make of new powersports vehicles or related products; except that this subsection (1)(k) shall not apply unless the powersports vehicle dealer:

Maintains a reasonable line of credit for each make or line of new powersports vehicle;

Remains in compliance with reasonable capital standards and reasonable facilities requirements specified by the powersports vehicle manufacturer; but "reasonable facilities requirements" shall not include a requirement that a powersports vehicle dealer establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space; and

Provides written notice to the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer's representative, no less than ninety days prior to the dealer's intent to participate in the management of, investment in, or acquisition of another line-make of new powersports vehicles or related products;

To fail to pay to a powersports vehicle dealer, within ninety days after the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise, all of the following:

The dealer cost, plus any charges made by the powersports vehicle manufacturer for distribution, delivery, and taxes, less all allowances paid or credited to the powersports vehicle dealer by the powersports vehicle manufacturer, of unused, undamaged, and unsold powersports vehicles in the powersports vehicle dealer's inventory that were acquired from the powersports vehicle manufacturer or from another powersports vehicle dealer of the same line-make in the ordinary course of business within the previous twelve months;

The dealer cost, less all allowances paid or credited to the powersports vehicle dealer by the powersports vehicle manufacturer, for all unused, undamaged, and unsold supplies, parts, and accessories in original packaging and listed in the powersports vehicle manufacturer's current parts catalog;

The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the powersports vehicle dealer and bearing a common name, trade name, or trademark of the powersports vehicle manufacturer if acquisition of the sign was required by the powersports vehicle manufacturer;

The fair market value of all special tools and equipment that were acquired from the powersports vehicle manufacturer or from sources approved and required by the powersports vehicle manufacturer and that are in good and usable condition, excluding normal wear and tear; and

The cost of transporting, handling, packing, and loading the powersports vehicles, supplies, parts, accessories, signs, special tools, equipment, and furnishings described in this subsection (1)(l);

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce a powersports vehicle dealer to close or change the location of the powersports vehicle dealer, or to make any substantial alterations to the dealer premises or facilities when doing so would be unreasonable or without written assurance of a sufficient supply of powersports vehicles so as to justify the changes, in light of the current market and economic conditions;

To authorize or permit a person to perform warranty service repairs on powersports vehicles unless the person is:

A powersports vehicle dealer with whom the powersports vehicle manufacturer has entered into a franchise agreement for the sale and service of the manufacturer's powersports vehicles; or

A person or government entity that has purchased new powersports vehicles pursuant to a powersports vehicle manufacturer's fleet discount program and is performing the warranty service repairs only on vehicles owned by the person or entity;

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce a powersports vehicle dealer to prospectively agree to a release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel that would relieve any person of a duty or liability imposed under this article 20 except in settlement of a bona fide dispute;

To discriminate between or refuse to offer to its same line-make franchised dealers all models manufactured for that line-make based upon unreasonable sales and service standards;

To fail to make practically available an incentive, rebate, bonus, or other similar benefit to a powersports vehicle dealer that is offered to another powersports vehicle dealer of the same line-make within this state;

To fail to pay to a powersports vehicle dealer:

Within ninety days after the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise for the failure of a dealer to meet performance sales and service obligations or after the termination, elimination, or cessation of a line-make, the cost of the lease for the facilities used for the franchise or line-make for the unexpired term of the lease, not to exceed one year; except that:

If the powersports vehicle dealer owns the facilities, the value of renting the facilities for one year, prorated for each line-make based upon total sales volume for the previous twelve months before the involuntary termination;

Nothing in this subsection (1)(r)(I) shall be construed to limit the application of subsection (1)(d) of this section;

Within ninety days after the termination, elimination, or cessation of a line-make or the termination of a franchise due to the insolvency of the manufacturer or distributor, the fair market value of the powersports vehicle dealer's goodwill for the line-make as of the date the manufacturer or distributor announces the action that results in the termination, elimination, or cessation, not including any amounts paid under subsections (1)(l)(I) to (1)(l)(V) of this section;

To condition a franchise agreement on improvements to a facility unless reasonably required by the technology of a powersports vehicle being sold at the facility;

To charge back, deny powersports vehicle allocation, withhold payments, or take other actions against a powersports vehicle dealer if a powersports vehicle sold by the powersports vehicle dealer is exported from Colorado unless the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative proves that the powersports vehicle dealer knew or reasonably should have known a powersports vehicle was intended to be exported, which shall operate as a rebuttable presumption that the powersports vehicle dealer did not have this knowledge;

Within ninety days after the termination, elimination, or cessation of a line-make or the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative, for any reason other than that the powersports vehicle dealer commits fraud, makes a misrepresentation, or commits any other crime within the scope of the franchise agreement or in the operation of the dealership, to fail to reimburse a powersports vehicle dealer for the cost depreciated by five percent per year of any upgrades or alterations to the powersports vehicle dealer's facilities required by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative within the previous five years;

To fail to notify a powersports vehicle dealer at least ninety days before the following and to provide the specific reasons for the following:

Directly or indirectly terminating, canceling, or not renewing a franchise agreement; or

Modifying, replacing, or attempting to modify or replace the franchise or selling agreement of a powersports dealer, including a change in the dealer's geographic area upon which sales or service performance is measured, if the modification would substantially and adversely alter the rights or obligations of the dealer under the current franchise or selling agreement or would substantially impair the sales or service obligations or the dealer's investment;

To require, coerce, or attempt to coerce a powersports dealer to substantially alter a facility or premises if the facility or premises has been altered within the last ten years at a cost of more than twenty-five thousand dollars, and the alteration was required and approved by the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative; except that this subsection (1)(w) does not apply to improvements made to comply with health or safety laws or to accommodate the technology requirements necessary to sell or service a line-make;

To sell or offer to sell new powersports vehicles to a franchised powersports vehicle dealer with whom the manufacturer has a franchise agreement at a lower actual price than the actual price offered to any other powersports vehicle dealer with whom the manufacturer has a franchise agreement for the same powersports vehicle similarly equipped; except that this subsection (1)(x) does not apply to:

Resale to any government;

Donation or use by the dealer in a driver education course; or

A price change made in the ordinary course of business if made available to all powersports vehicle dealers when the price changes.

This subsection (1)(x) does not prohibit a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative from offering incentive programs, sales-promotion plans, or other discounts if the incentives or discounts are reasonably available to all powersports vehicle dealers with whom the manufacturer has a franchise agreement.

To require a powersports vehicle dealer to grant a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative the following or to enforce the following if the exercise of the contractual right would stop the transfer of the powersports vehicle dealer ownership from an owner to an immediate family member of the owner:

A right of first refusal to purchase the powersports vehicle dealer; or

An option to purchase the powersports vehicle dealer; and

To use an unreasonable, arbitrary, or unfair performance standard in determining a powersports vehicle dealer's compliance with a franchise agreement; or

To fail to communicate, upon the request of the dealer, any performance standard in a clear and concise writing to a powersports vehicle dealer before applying the standard to the powersports vehicle dealer.

It is unlawful for a person to act as a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, powersports vehicle manufacturer, powersports vehicle distributor, powersports vehicle manufacturer representative, or powersports vehicle salesperson unless the person has been duly licensed under this part 4; except that this subsection (2) does not apply to a business owner selling a powersports vehicle if the vehicle has been owned for more than one year, the vehicle has been used exclusively for business purposes, the vehicle is titled in the name of the business, all taxes for the vehicle have been paid, and the total number of vehicles sold by the business owner over a two-year period does not exceed twenty vehicles.

Source:

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (HB 18-1105), ch. 28, p. 328, § 2, effective August 8; entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 120, § 2, effective October 1; (1)(a) and IP(1)(x)(I) amended, (HB 18-1354), ch. 349, p. 2073, § 2, effective October 1.

44-20-424. New, reopened, or relocated dealer - notice required - grounds for refusal of dealer license - definitions - rules.

No powersports vehicle manufacturer or distributor shall establish an additional powersports vehicle dealer, reopen a previously existing powersports vehicle dealer, or authorize an existing powersports vehicle dealer without first providing at least sixty days' notice to all of its franchised dealers within whose relevant market area the new, reopened, or relocated dealer would be located. The notice must state:

The specific location at which the additional, reopened, or relocated powersports vehicle dealer will be established;

The date on or after which the powersports vehicle manufacturer intends to be engaged in business with the additional, reopened, or relocated powersports vehicle dealer at the proposed location; and

The identity of all powersports vehicle dealers who are franchised to sell the same line-make of vehicles with licensed locations in the relevant market area where the additional, reopened, or relocated powersports vehicle dealer is proposed to be located.

A powersports vehicle manufacturer shall approve or disapprove of a powersports vehicle dealer facility initial site location, relocation, or reopening request within sixty days after the request or after sending the notice required by subsection (1) of this section to all of its franchised powersports vehicle dealers, whichever is later.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

The relocation of an existing dealer within two miles of its current location; or

The establishment of a replacement dealer, within two years, either at the former location or within two miles of the former location.

As used in this section:

"Powersports manufacturer" means a powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

"Relevant market area" means the greater of the following:

The geographic area of responsibility defined in the franchise agreement of an existing dealer; or

The geographic area within a radius of ten miles of any existing dealer of the same line-make of powersports vehicle as the proposed additional motor vehicle dealer.

An existing powersports vehicle dealer adversely affected by the reopening or relocation of an existing same line-make powersports vehicle dealer or the addition of a same line-make powersports vehicle dealer may, within ninety days after receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section, file a legal action in a district court of competent jurisdiction or file an administrative complaint with the executive director to prevent or enjoin the relocation, reopening, or addition of the proposed powersports vehicle dealer. An existing powersports vehicle dealer is adversely affected if:

(I) The dealer is located within the relevant market area of the proposed relocated, reopened, or additional dealership described in the notice required in subsection (1) of this section; or

(II) The existing dealer or dealers of the same line-make show that, during any twelve-month period within the thirty-six months preceding the receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section, the dealer or dealers, or a dealer's predecessor, made at least twenty-five percent of the dealer's retail sales of new powersports vehicles to persons whose addresses are located within ten miles of the location of the proposed relocated, reopened, or additional dealership.

The executive director shall refer a complaint filed under this section to an administrative law judge in the office of administrative courts for final agency action.

In any court or administrative action, the manufacturer has the burden of proof on each of the following issues:

The change in population;

The relevant vehicle buyer profiles;

The relevant historical new powersports vehicle registrations for the line-make of vehicles versus the manufacturer's actual competitors in the relevant market area;

Whether the opening of the proposed reopened, relocated, or additional powersports vehicle dealer is materially beneficial to the public interest or the consumers in the relevant market area;

Whether the powersports vehicle dealers of the same line-make in the relevant market area are providing adequate representation and convenient customer care, including the adequacy of sales and service facilities, equipment, parts, and qualified service personnel, for powersports vehicles of the same line-make in the relevant market area;

The reasonably expected market penetration of the line-make, given the factors affecting penetration; and

Whether the reopened, relocated, or additional dealership is reasonable and justifiable based on expected economic and market conditions within the relevant market area.

In any court or administrative action, the powersports vehicle dealer has the burden of proof on each of the following issues:

Whether the manufacturer engaged in any action or omission that, directly or indirectly, denied the existing powersports vehicle dealer of the same line-make the opportunity for reasonable growth or market expansion;

Whether the manufacturer has coerced or attempted to coerce any existing powersports vehicle dealer into consenting to additional or relocated franchises of the same line-make in the community or territory or relevant market area; and

The size and permanency of the investment of, and the obligations incurred by, the existing powersports vehicle dealers of the same line-make located in the relevant market area.

In a legal or administrative action challenging the relocation, reopening, or addition of a powersports vehicle dealer, the district court or administrative law judge shall make a determination, based on the factors identified in subsections (5)(c) and (5)(d) of this section, of whether the relocation, reopening, or addition of a powersports vehicle dealer is:

In the public interest; and

Fair and equitable to the existing powersports vehicle dealers.

The district court or the executive director shall deny any proposed relocation, reopening, or addition of a powersports vehicle dealer unless the manufacturer shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the existing powersports vehicle dealer or dealers of the same line-make in the relevant market area of the proposed dealership are not providing adequate representation of the line-make powersports vehicles. A determination to deny, prevent, or enjoin the relocation, reopening, or addition of a powersports vehicle dealer is effective for at least eighteen months.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 126, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-524 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-425. Independent control of dealer - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no powersports vehicle manufacturer shall own, operate, or control any powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer in Colorado.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the following activities are not prohibited:

Operation of a powersports vehicle dealer for a temporary period, not to exceed twelve months, during the transition from one owner or operator to another independent owner or operator; except that the executive director may extend the period, not to exceed twenty-four months, upon a showing by the manufacturer or distributor of the need to operate the dealership for such time to achieve a transition from an owner or operator to another independent third-party owner or operator;

Ownership or control of a powersports vehicle dealer while the dealer is being sold under a bona fide contract or purchase option to the operator of the dealer;

Participation in the ownership of the powersports vehicle dealer solely for the purpose of providing financing or a capital loan that will enable the dealer to become the majority owner of the dealer in less than seven years; and

Operation of a powersports vehicle dealer if the powersports vehicle manufacturer has no other franchised dealers of the same line-make in this state.

As used in this section:

"Control" means to possess, directly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise; except that "control" does not include the relationship between a powersports vehicle manufacturer and a powersports vehicle dealer under a franchise agreement.

"Operate" means to directly or indirectly manage a powersports vehicle dealer.

"Own" means to hold any beneficial ownership interest of one percent or more class of equity interest in a powersports vehicle dealer, whether as a shareholder, partner, limited liability company member, or otherwise. To "hold" an ownership interest means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership interest, either directly or through a fiduciary or agent.

"Powersports vehicle manufacturer" means a powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 128, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-525 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-426. Successor under existing franchise agreement - duties of powersports vehicle manufacturer.

If a licensed powersports vehicle dealer under franchise by a powersports vehicle manufacturer dies or becomes incapacitated, the powersports vehicle manufacturer shall act in good faith to allow a successor, which may include a family member, designated by the deceased or incapacitated powersports vehicle dealer to succeed to ownership and operation of the dealer under the existing franchise agreement if:

Within ninety days after the powersports vehicle dealer's death or incapacity, the designated successor gives the powersports vehicle manufacturer written notice of an intent to succeed to the rights of the deceased or incapacitated powersports vehicle dealer in the franchise agreement;

The designated successor agrees to be bound by all of the terms and conditions of the existing franchise agreement; and

The designated successor meets the criteria generally applied by the powersports vehicle manufacturer in qualifying powersports vehicle dealers.

A powersports vehicle manufacturer may refuse to honor the existing franchise agreement with the designated successor only for good cause. The powersports vehicle manufacturer may request in writing from a designated successor the personal and financial data that is reasonably necessary to determine whether the existing franchise agreement should be honored, and the designated successor shall supply the data promptly upon request.

If a powersports vehicle manufacturer believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the requested succession, the powersports vehicle manufacturer shall send the designated successor, by certified or overnight mail, notice of its refusal to approve the succession within sixty days after the later of:

Receipt of the notice of the designated successor's intent to succeed the powersports vehicle dealer in the ownership and operation of the dealer; or

The receipt of the requested personal and financial data.

Failure to serve the notice pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be considered approval of the designated successor, and the franchise agreement is considered amended to reflect the approval of the succession the day following the last day of the notice period specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

If the powersports vehicle manufacturer gives notice of refusal to approve the succession, the notice shall state the specific grounds for the refusal and shall state that the franchise agreement shall be discontinued not less than ninety days after the date the notice of refusal is served unless the proposed successor files an action in the district court to enjoin the action.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a powersports vehicle dealer from designating a person as the successor in advance, by written instrument filed with the powersports vehicle manufacturer. If the powersports vehicle dealer files the instrument, that instrument governs the succession rights to the management and operation of the dealer subject to the designated successor satisfying the powersports vehicle manufacturer's qualification requirements as described in this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 129, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-526 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-427. Audit reimbursement limitations - dealer claims.

A manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative shall have the right to audit warranty, sales, or incentive claims of a powersports vehicle dealer for nine months after the date the claim was submitted.

A manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative shall not require documentation for warranty, sales, or incentive claims or audit warranty, sales, or incentive claims of a powersports vehicle dealer more than fifteen months after the date the claim was submitted, nor shall the manufacturer require a charge back, reimbursement, or credit against a future transaction arising out of an audit or request for documentation arising more than nine months after the date the claim was submitted.

The powersports vehicle dealer shall have nine months after making a sale or providing service to submit warranty, sales, or incentive claims to the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not limit any action for fraud instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction.

A powersports vehicle dealer may request a determination from the executive director, within thirty days, that a charge back, reimbursement, or credit required violates subsection (1) of this section. If a determination is requested within the thirty-day period, then the charge back, reimbursement, or credit shall be stayed pending the decision of the executive director. If the executive director determines after a hearing that the charge back, reimbursement, or credit violates subsection (1) of this section, the charge back, reimbursement, or credit shall be void.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 130, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-526.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-428. Reimbursement for disapproving sale.

A manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable attorney fees, not to exceed the usual and customary fees charged for the transfer of a franchise, and reasonable expenses that are incurred by the proposed owner or transferee before the manufacturer or distributor exercised its right of first refusal in negotiating and implementing the contract for the proposed change of ownership or the transfer of assets. Payment of attorney fees and expenses is not required if the claimant has failed to submit an accounting of attorney fees and expenses within twenty days after the receipt of the manufacturer's or dealer's written request for an accounting. An expense accounting may be requested by the manufacturer or distributor before exercising its right of first refusal.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 131, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-526.7 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-429. Penalty.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who willfully violates this part 4 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

A person who willfully violates section 44-20-423 (2) by acting as a powersports vehicle manufacturer, powersports vehicle distributor, or powersports vehicle manufacturer representative without proper authorization commits a petty offense.

A person who willfully violates section 44-20-423 (2) by acting as a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, or powersports vehicle salesperson without proper authorization commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 131, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3328, § 788, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-527 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-430. Fines - disposition - unlicensed sales.

Of any fine collected for a violation of section 44-20-423 (2), half is awarded to the law enforcement agency that investigated and issued the citation for the violation and half is credited to the auto dealers license fund created in section 44-20-133.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1105), ch. 28, p. 329, § 3, effective August 8; entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 132, § 2, effective October 1.

44-20-431. Drafts or checks not honored for payment - penalties.

If a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer issues a draft or check to a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer and fails to honor the draft or check, then the license of the licensee shall be subject to suspension pursuant to section 44-20-420. The license suspension shall be effective upon the date of a final decision against the licensee. A licensee whose license has been suspended pursuant to this subsection (1) shall not be eligible for reinstatement of the license and shall not be eligible to apply for another license issued under this part 4 unless it is demonstrated to the board that the unpaid draft or check has been paid in full and that any fine imposed on the licensee pursuant to subsection (2) of this section has been paid in full.

A wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer that issues a draft or check to a wholesaler, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer and who fails to honor the draft or check, causing loss to a third party, commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars. Any fine collected for a violation of this subsection (2) shall be awarded to the law enforcement agency that investigated and issued the citation for the violation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 132, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-529 as it existed prior to 2018.